Massachusetts, session 194th, S1987.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after subsection (cc)(1) the following new subsection:-
(dd)(1) A credit for child care services expenses paid by the taxpayer shall be allowed
against the tax liability imposed by this chapter, for a taxpayer filing single, married filing jointly
or head of household. Said child care service must be a provider licensed by the Commonwealth
in order to qualify for the tax credit. The child receiving child care services must be a dependent
of the taxpayer. The total credit allowable per tax year shall not exceed three thousand dollars
per child. Only one taxpayer of the two taxpayers who file jointly married filing shall be eligible
to qualify for the tax credit.
of 1